Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.200

Probation by court—Investigation by secretary of corrections.

After conviction by plea or verdict of guilty of any crime, the court upon application or its own motion, may summarily grant or deny probation, or at a subsequent time fixed may hear and determine, in the presence of the defendant, the matter of probation of the defendant, and the conditions of such probation, if granted. The court may, in its discretion, prior to the hearing on the granting of probation, refer the matter to the secretary of corrections or such officers as the secretary may designate for investigation and report to the court at a specified time, upon the circumstances surrounding the crime and concerning the defendant, his or her prior record, and his or her family surroundings and environment.

[ 2011 c 336 s 340; 1981 c 136 s 41; 1979 c 141 s 6; 1967 c 134 s 15; 1957 c 227 s 3. Prior: 1949 c 59 s 1; 1939 c 125 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 10249-5a.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: ER 410.

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.

Severability—1939 c 125: "If any section or provision of this act shall be adjudged to be invalid or unconstitutional, such adjudication shall not affect the validity of this act as a whole, or of any section, provision or part thereof not adjudged invalid or unconstitutional." [1939 c 125 s 3 p 356.]

Suspending sentences: RCW 9.92.060.